Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16A.17, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Exceptions. The commissioner shall prescribe procedures to assure payment is made only for hours worked except: (1) for leave under a collective bargaining agreement; (2) for leave under a plan according to section 43A.18 or the rules of the Department of Management and Budget; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) to resolve a formal employee grievance permitted by law or collective bargaining agreementnew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) to distribute a financial penalty paid by an agency responsible for late payroll payment issuance when a penalty is required under a collective bargaining agreementnew text end .